Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2500.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 9806 and 9811 introductory paragraph of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 9806. Administration.(a) Staffing.--Subject to 32 U.S.C. § 509 (relating to National Guard Youth Challenge Program of opportunities for civilian youth) and its implementing regulations and applicable agreements, the program shall be staffed by the administrative, professional, technical and clerical employees necessary for the operation of the program.(b) Rules and regulations.--The department may make rules and regulations for the general direction, administration and control of the program.12345678910111213141516171819 § 9811. Audit required.The department shall undergo an annual audit of the program. The audit shall be conducted [by a qualified independent certified public accountant] under generally accepted audit standards [of the Governmental Accounting Standards Board]. The audit shall be submitted to the following:* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2500PN3385 - 2 - 12345678